Washington statutes.
RCW 7.69.010

Intent.

In recognition of the severe and detrimental impact of crime on victims, survivors of victims, and witnesses of crime and the civic and moral duty of victims, survivors of victims, and witnesses of crimes to fully and voluntarily cooperate with law enforcement and prosecutorial agencies, and in further recognition of the continuing importance of such citizen cooperation to state and local law enforcement efforts and the general effectiveness and well-being of the criminal justice system of this state, the legislature declares its intent, in this chapter, to grant to the victims of crime and the survivors of such victims a significant role, including enhanced accessibility, in the criminal justice system. The legislature further intends to ensure that all victims and witnesses of crime are treated with dignity, respect, courtesy, and sensitivity; ensure that all victims and witnesses are afforded access to justice to participate in criminal justice proceedings, including the opportunity to participate and attend court hearings in person or remotely, including by video or other electronic means as available in the local jurisdiction; and that the rights extended in this chapter to victims, survivors of victims, and witnesses of crime are honored, protected, and upheld by law enforcement agencies, prosecutors, and judges in a manner no less vigorous than the protections afforded criminal defendants.

[ 2024 c 297 s 9; 1985 c 443 s 1; 1981 c 145 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 297: See note following RCW 7.68.127.

Severability—1985 c 443: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1985 c 443 s 27.]

Effective date—1985 c 443: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect on July 1, 1985." [ 1985 c 443 s 28.]